Hawaii statutes.
§841-12 Removal of corpse. [(a)] No
corpse or remains of any dead human body appearing to have come to death under
any of the circumstances set forth in section 841-3, shall be moved or
disturbed from its place of death or disposed of by any person including the
coroner or the coroner's deputies, the chief of police, or any police officer,
without first receiving the authority of the coroner or the coroner's deputy,
and of the police officer in charge, and of the coroner's physician. The
removal of the body or bodies shall be the duty of the coroner.

[(b)] Any person who violates the provisions
of this section shall be subject to a fine of not more than $100. [L 1941, c
288, pt of §1; RL 1945, §10911; am L 1949, c 355, §2; RL 1955, §260-12; HRS
§715-12; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1977, c 141, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next